test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-caad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - čââʹđ â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     čââʹđ+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: čââʹđ
     čââʹđ+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: čâđđam
     čââʹđ+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: čâđđam
     čââʹđ+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: čâđđma
     čââʹđ+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: čâđđmest
     čââʹđ+N+Sg+Com+Indef: čâđđmin
     čââʹđ+N+Ess+Indef: čââʹđen
     čââʹđ+N+Par+Indef: čââʹđed
     čââʹđ+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [čâđđamtaa, čâđđamtää]
     čââʹđ+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: čâđđam
     čââʹđ+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: čâđđmi
     čââʹđ+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: čâđđmid
     čââʹđ+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: čâđđmid
     čââʹđ+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: čâđđmin
     čââʹđ+N+Pl+Com+Indef: čâđđmivuiʹm
     čââʹđ+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [čâđđmitaa, čâđđmitää]
